Maryland, session 2025, SB0335.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Natural Resources
10–409.
(A) [Pursuant to] IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 10–205 of this title, the Department
shall establish and publish by April 25 each year the bag limits per day for game birds and
mammals by regulation for the ensuing year.
(B) [The] EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN SUBSECTION (C) OF THIS SECTION, THE
bag limits for ducks, geese, brant, railbirds, woodcock, mergansers, doves, and snipe may
conform to the federal migratory bird rules and regulations adopted annually by the
Secretary of the Interior of the United States.
(C) (1) THIS SUBSECTION DOES NOT APPLY IN:
(I) ALLEGANY COUNTY;
(II) FREDERICK COUNTY;
(III) GARRETT COUNTY;
(IV) WASHINGTON COUNTY; AND
– 1 –

Ch. 554 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(V) THE PORTION OF CARROLL COUNTY GEOGRAPHICALLY
WEST OF ROUTE 31 AND ROUTE 97.
(2) DURING THE MIGRATORY CANADA GOOSE (ATLANTIC
POPULATION) HUNTING SEASON, THE BAG LIMIT FOR ALL CANADA GEESE IN THE
STATE, INCLUDING GEESE FOUND IN THE ATLANTIC FLYWAY RESIDENT
POPULATION HUNT ZONE AND THE ATLANTIC POPULATION HUNT ZONE, SHALL
CONFORM TO THE BAG LIMIT FOR ATLANTIC POPULATION CANADA GEESE ADOPTED
ANNUALLY BY THE DEPARTMENT OF THE INTERIOR’S U.S. FISH AND WILDLIFE
SERVICE.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2025. It shall remain effective for a period of 5 years and, at the end of June 30, 2030,
this Act, with no further action required by the General Assembly, shall be abrogated and
of no further force and effect.
Approved by the Governor, May 13, 2025.
– 2 –